Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WINGS OF THE NORTH AVIATION MUSEUM AND EDUCATION CENTER.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to Wings of the North for predesign and site development of an aviation museum and education center on the campus of Flying Cloud Airport in the city of Eden Prairie. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end